Maine, session 132, LD947.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §4401, sub-§1 is enacted to read:
1. Overnight docking on islands of ferry vessels. The Department of Transportation
shall allow a ferry vessel operating under this section to dock overnight at its island port or
to dock overnight at a mainland port when that docking is common practice.
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §4401, sub-§2 is enacted to read:
2. Exception. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the Department of Transportation may
require a ferry vessel to dock at a mainland port or at an alternative island port for an
emergency situation, including, but not limited to, an extreme weather event.
Sec. 3. 23 MRSA §4401, as amended by PL 1999, c. 20, §1, is further amended by
enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.